Nebraska, session 109, LB616.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-3606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3606 (1) A pretrial diversion plan for minor traffic violations
shall consist of a driver's safety training program.
(2) A driver's safety training program shall:
(a) Provide a curriculum of driver's safety training, as approved by
the department, which is designed to educate persons committing minor
traffic violations and to deter future violations; and
(b) Except as provided in section 5 of this act, require Require
payment of a fee approved by the department which is reasonable and
appropriate to defray the cost of the presentation of the program. A
jurisdiction shall charge a uniform fee for participation in a driver's
safety training program regardless of the traffic violation for which the
applicant was cited. Fees received by a jurisdiction offering a driver's
safety training program may be utilized by such jurisdiction to pay for
the costs of administering and operating such program, to promote driver
safety, and to pay for the costs of administering and operating other
safety and educational programs within such jurisdiction.
(3) The program administrator of each driver's safety training
program shall keep a record of attendees and shall be responsible for
determining eligibility. A report of attendees at all driver's safety
training programs in the state shall be shared only with similar programs
throughout the state. All procedures for sharing records of attendees
among such programs shall conform with the rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated by the department to assure that no individual takes the
approved course more than once within any three-year period in Nebraska.
Such record of attendees and any related records shall not be considered
a public record as defined in section 84-712.01.
(4) The department shall approve the curriculum and fees of each
program and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing
such programs, including guidelines for fees, curriculum, and instructor
-2-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
certification.
Sec. 2. Section 60-392, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-392 (1) Except as provided otherwise in this section,
registration may be renewed annually in a manner designated by the
department and upon payment of the same fee as provided for the original
registration and upon payment of any fee required under section 5 of this
act. On making an application for renewal, the registration certificate
for the preceding registration period or renewal notice or other evidence
designated by the department shall be presented with the application. A
person may renew an annual registration up to thirty days prior to the
date of expiration.
(2) The certificate of registration and license plates issued by the
department shall be valid during the registration period for which they
are issued, and when validation decals issued pursuant to section
60-3,101 have been affixed to the license plates, the plates shall also
be valid for the registration period designated by such validation
decals. If a person renews an annual registration up to thirty days prior
to the date of expiration, the registration shall be valid for such time
period as well.
(3) The registration period for motor vehicles and trailers required
to be registered as provided in section 60-362 shall expire on the first
day of the month one year from the month of issuance, and renewal shall
become due on such day and shall become delinquent on the first day of
the following month.
(4) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to
dealer's license plates, repossession plates, and transporter plates as
provided in sections 60-373, 60-375, 60-378, and 60-379, which plates
shall be issued for a calendar year.
(5) The registration period for apportioned vehicles as provided in
section 60-3,198 shall be renewed monthly, quarterly, or annually at the
-3-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
discretion of the director. Such registration period expires on the last
day of the registration period and renewal is delinquent on the first day
of the second full month following such expiration date. The department
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish a staggered
registration system for apportioned vehicles registered pursuant to
section 60-3,198, including the collection of eighteen or fewer months of
registration fees.
Sec. 3. Section 60-4,182, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-4,182 In order to prevent and eliminate successive traffic
violations, there is hereby provided a point system dealing with traffic
violations as disclosed by the files of the director. The following point
system shall be adopted:
(1) Conviction of motor vehicle homicide - 12 points;
(2) Third offense drunken driving in violation of any city or
village ordinance or of section 60-6,196, as disclosed by the conviction
record of the court's order - 12 points;
(3) Failure to stop and render aid as required under section 60-697
in the event of involvement in a motor vehicle accident resulting in the
death or personal injury of another - 6 points;
(4) Failure to stop and report as required under section 60-696 or
any city or village ordinance in the event of a motor vehicle accident
resulting in property damage - 6 points;
(5) Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic
liquor or any drug or when such person has a concentration of eight-
hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters of his or her blood or per two hundred ten liters of his or
her breath in violation of any city or village ordinance or of section
60-6,196 - 6 points;
(6) Willful reckless driving in violation of any city or village
ordinance or of section 60-6,214 or 60-6,217 - 6 points;
-4-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
(7) Careless driving in violation of any city or village ordinance
or of section 60-6,212 - 4 points;
(8) Negligent driving in violation of any city or village ordinance
- 3 points;
(9) Reckless driving in violation of any city or village ordinance
or of section 60-6,213 - 5 points;
(10) Speeding in violation of any city or village ordinance or any
of sections 60-6,185 to 60-6,190 and 60-6,313:
(a) More than five miles per hour but not more than ten miles per
hour over the speed limit - 2 points;
(b) More than ten miles per hour but not more than thirty-five miles
per hour over the speed limit - 3 points, except that one point shall be
assessed upon conviction of exceeding by not more than ten miles per
hour, two points shall be assessed upon conviction of exceeding by more
than ten miles per hour but not more than fifteen miles per hour, and
three points shall be assessed upon conviction of exceeding by more than
fifteen miles per hour but not more than thirty-five miles per hour the
speed limits provided for in subdivision (1)(f), (g), (h), or (i) of
section 60-6,186; and
(c) More than thirty-five miles per hour over the speed limit - 4
points;
(11) Failure to yield to a pedestrian not resulting in bodily injury
to a pedestrian - 2 points;
(12) Failure to yield to a pedestrian resulting in bodily injury to
a pedestrian - 4 points;
(13) Using a handheld wireless communication device in violation of
section 60-6,179.01 or texting while driving in violation of subsection
(1) or (3) of section 60-6,179.02 - 3 points;
(14) Using a handheld mobile telephone in violation of subsection
(2) or (4) of section 60-6,179.02 - 3 points;
(15) Unlawful obstruction or interference of the view of an operator
-5-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
in violation of section 60-6,256 - 1 point;
(16) A violation of subsection (1) of section 60-6,175 - 3 points;
and
(17) All other traffic violations involving the operation of motor
vehicles by the operator for which reports to the Department of Motor
Vehicles are required under sections 60-497.01 and 60-497.02 - 1 point.
Subdivision (17) of this section does not include violations
involving an occupant protection system or a three-point safety belt
system pursuant to section 60-6,270; parking violations; violations for
operating a motor vehicle without a valid operator's license in the
operator's possession; muffler violations; overwidth, overheight, or
overlength violations; autocycle, motorcycle, or moped protective helmet
violations; or overloading of trucks; or a red light violation pursuant
to section 5 of this act.
All such points shall be assessed against the driving record of the
operator as of the date of the violation for which conviction was had.
Points may be reduced by the department under section 60-4,188.
In all cases, the forfeiture of bail not vacated shall be regarded
as equivalent to the conviction of the offense with which the operator
was charged.
The point system shall not apply to persons convicted of traffic
violations committed while operating a bicycle as defined in section
60-611 or an electric personal assistive mobility device as defined in
section 60-618.02.
Sec. 4. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and section 5 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.
Sec. 5. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Automatic license plate reader system has the same meaning as in
section 60-3202; and
-6-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
(b) Red light violation means a violation of section 60-6,123
involving a steady circular red indication or a steady red arrow
indication.
(2) A local authority may enforce red light violations by use of any
automatic license plate reader system if the following requirements are
met:
(a) The violator is offered a choice to pay a fee or to participate
in a driver's safety training program offered pursuant to a pretrial
diversion plan for minor traffic violations as provided in sections
29-3605 to 29-3609;
(b) If the violator participates in such driver's safety training
program, the local authority shall waive the fee for such program;
(c) No points shall be assessed for the violation under section
60-4,182; and
(d) No warrant shall be issued for failure to pay the fee or
participate in the driver's safety training program.
(3) If a person does not complete the driver's safety training
program and does not pay the fee, the person shall pay the fee to the
county treasurer as a precondition of renewing any registration under
section 60-392. The county treasurer shall allocate the proceeds of the
fee to each county, local school system, school district, city, and
village in the tax district in which the motor vehicle has situs.
(4) Any evidence or information obtained or derived from an
automatic license plate reader system under this section shall not be
admissible in any proceeding not involving enforcement of this section.
Sec. 6. Section 60-3203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3203 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or in
section 60-3204, the use of an automatic license plate reader system by a
governmental entity is prohibited.
(2) An automatic license plate reader system may be used when such
-7-

LB616 LB616
2025 2025
use is:
(a) By a law enforcement agency of a governmental entity for the
purpose of:
(i) Identifying identifying:
(A) (i) Outstanding parking or traffic violations;
(B) (ii) An unregistered or uninsured vehicle;
(C) (iii) A vehicle in violation of the vehicle equipment
requirements set forth under the Nebraska Rules of the Road;
(D) (iv) A vehicle in violation of any other vehicle registration
requirement;
(E) (v) A vehicle registered to an individual for whom there is an
outstanding warrant;
(F) (vi) A vehicle associated with a missing person;
(G) (vii) A vehicle that has been reported as stolen; or
(H) (viii) A vehicle that is relevant and material to an ongoing
criminal investigation; or
(ii) Enforcing a red light violation pursuant to section 5 of this
act;
(b) By a parking enforcement entity for regulating the use of a
parking facility;
(c) For the purpose of controlling access to a secured area;
(d) For the purpose of electronic toll collection; or
(e) To assist weighing stations in performing their duties under
section 60-1301.
Sec. 7. Original sections 29-3606, 60-4,182, and 60-3203, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-392 and 60-601, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-